Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-104
Drainage improvements; petition for construction.

A petition for any such improvements shall be made to the county board, signed by one or more owners of lots and lands which shall be benefited thereby, which petition shall be filed with the county clerk, shall set forth the necessity of the proposed improvement and describe the route and termini thereof with reasonable certainty, and shall be accompanied by a good and sufficient bond signed by two or more sureties, to be approved by the county clerk, conditioned for the payment of all costs that may accrue in case the county board shall find against such improvement.

Laws 1881, c. 51, § 4, p. 237;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 4, p. 454;

R.S.1913, § 1721;

C.S.1922, § 1668;

C.S.1929, § 31-104;

R.S.1943, § 31-104.

Petition, stating ditch will drain lands owned by petitioners, is sufficient allegation of ownership. Seng v. Payne, 87 Neb. 812, 128 N.W. 625 (1910).

Petitioners are not liable for expenses of engineer after board finds for improvement. State ex rel. Sullivan v. Ross, 82 Neb. 414, 118 N.W. 85 (1908).

Description in petition was sufficient. Dodge County v. Acom, 61 Neb. 376, 85 N.W. 292 (1901).

Bond is jurisdictional; common law bond is sufficient. Casey v. Burt County, 59 Neb. 624, 81 N.W. 851 (1900).

If board has jurisdiction, irregularities in proceedings will not render assessment void. Darst v. Griffin, 31 Neb. 668, 48 N.W. 819 (1891).

Failure to make finding that petitioners are freeholders is not fatal. Objector must proceed promptly. County of Dakota v. Cheney, 22 Neb. 437, 35 N.W. 211 (1887).